Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska41-209
Proprietor's liability for baggage and wearing apparel; amount.

Every person, firm, or corporation maintaining, operating, or conducting a hotel, restaurant, apartment house, motel, or rooming house, where a suitable room or rooms are provided for the reception and keeping of trunks, packages, wearing apparel, and similar articles, who, on the request of a bona fide guest of such place of business, receives for safekeeping any trunk, bag, or articles of wearing apparel, or similar articles shall (1) issue to such guest a receipt or check therefor, (2) be responsible for such property so taken, and (3) be liable for loss, damage, or injury to such property, except that the person, firm, or corporation, operating such hotel, restaurant, apartment house, motel, or rooming house, shall not be required to receive and be responsible for any (a) trunk and its contents to the value of more than two hundred dollars, (b) valise, grip, or sample case and its contents to the value of more than seventy-five dollars, (c) box, bundle, or package and its contents to the value of more than twenty-five dollars, or (d) miscellaneous other effects, including wearing apparel and personal belongings so checked to the value of more than seventy-five dollars, unless he or she shall have consented in writing with such guest to assume a greater responsibility.

Laws 1982, LB 547, § 9.